Hawaii statutes.
§412:10-305 Minor accounts. Payments
on share and deposit accounts may be received from a minor who may withdraw
funds from such accounts including the dividends and interest thereon.
Payments on share and deposit accounts by a minor and withdrawals thereof by
the minor shall be valid in all respects. For such purposes a minor is deemed
of full age. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next